Tennessee, session 114, HB0076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-202(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) Abandons an animal in the person's custody. It is not a defense to
prosecution under this subdivision (a)(3) that the person abandoned the animal at or
near an animal shelter, veterinary clinic, or other place of shelter if the person did not
make reasonable arrangements for the care of the animal;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0076
000407
- 1 -